Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.352

1947 conveyance for arboretum and botanical garden purposes—Deed of conveyance.

The commissioner of public lands is hereby authorized and directed to certify the lands described in RCW 28B.20.350 to the governor, and the governor is hereby authorized and directed to execute, and the secretary of state to attest, a deed of said shorelands to the university.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.352. Prior: 1947 c 45 s 2. Formerly RCW 28.77.315.]